Utah statutes.
53-6-212.   Responsibility for training -- Certification.

(1)  The division is not responsible for providing basic or in-service training for peace officers defined and designated in Sections 53-13-104 through 53-13-106 except for approval of the instructors and content of training where required by this chapter, Title 53, Chapter 13, Peace Officer Classifications, or division rules.

(2)  Where this chapter or Title 53, Chapter 13, Peace Officer Classifications, requires an agency head to certify that a member has completed required training, the division shall rely on the certification, as provided, to be accurate.



Amended by Chapter 92, 1999 General Session

